Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142F.121] MINNESOTA SNAP STEP UP FOR SENIORS PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish the Minnesota SNAP step up for seniors program to supplement the minimum monthly benefit amount for eligible seniors who receive federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Eligible senior" means an individual age 55 or older. new text end new text begin (c) "Minimum monthly benefit amount" means $50. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Supplemental benefit. new text end new text begin Under this program, if a household includes an eligible senior and receives a federally funded SNAP benefit of less than the minimum monthly benefit amount, the state shall provide a supplement to increase the total benefit to at least the minimum monthly benefit amount. Households with an eligible senior must receive the supplemental benefit under this section in addition to the federal SNAP benefit. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Prohibition on counting supplemental benefit as income. new text end new text begin The benefit amount received by an eligible senior or household under this section is not counted as income for any program that does not count SNAP benefits as income. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Program administration. new text end new text begin (a) The program under this section is subject to the same federal and state regulations, rules, and procedures for implementing the federal SNAP as much as possible, including but not limited to distributing the program benefit amount through the SNAP electronic benefit transfer system. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may increase the minimum monthly benefit amount established in this section as deemed appropriate and subject to state appropriations and federal funding. new text end new text begin (c) If federal funds become available for the purpose of this section, the commissioner shall utilize the federal funds as the primary source for issuing the monthly supplemental benefit before any state funds are used. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin FEDERAL WAIVER OR APPROVAL; MINNESOTA SNAP STEP UP FOR SENIORS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services shall apply to the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service for any necessary waivers or approvals to implement the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.121. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA SNAP STEP UP FOR SENIORS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the Minnesota SNAP step up for seniors program under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.121. new text end